Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.220

Licensee's bond to operate market—Amount when no prior business operations—Minimum and maximum amount.

If the application for a license to operate a public livestock market is from a new public livestock market which has not operated in the past twelve-month period, the director shall determine a bond, in a reasonable sum, that the applicant shall execute in favor of the state, which shall not be less than ten thousand dollars nor greater than twenty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That the director may at any time, upon written notice, review the licensee's operations and determine whether, because of increased or decreased sales, the amount of the bond should be altered.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 192 s 7; 1959 c 107 s 22.]